Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-122] Board of education; eligibility.
Except as otherwise provided by law, state officers shall be eligible for
appointment and membership to the board. No person shall be eligible for
appointment to the board:

(1) Under section 302A-121(a)(1) through (4) unless
the person is a resident of the county from which the person is to be
appointed; or

(2) Under section 302A-121(a)(5) unless the person is
a resident of the State. [L 2011, c 5, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next